District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.07

Temporary registration.

The Mayor may issue a temporary certificate of registration while an application for registration or renewal of registration is pending.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2887.03.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.